el: Πρότυπο σπειρώματος βαρελιού: Angel; Autococker; Γρήγορα σπειρώματα Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Άλλο
th: มาตรฐานเกลียวของลำกล้อง: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast threads; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; อื่นๆ
pl: Standard gwintu barrela: Angel; Autococker; Szybki gwint Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Inny
ko: 배럴 나사산 규격: 엔젤; 오토코커; 코커 패스트 스레드; 이온/임펄스; 스파이더; 팁만 98; 팁만 A-5/X-7; 기타
fi: Rungon kierrestandardi: Angel; Autococker; Cocker-pikakierteet; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Muu
ja: バレルスレッド標準: エンジェル; オートコッカー; コッカーファストスレッド; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; その他
ru: Стандарт резьбы ствола: Angel; Autococker; Быстрая резьба Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Другое
sl-SI: Standard navoja cevi: Angel; Autococker; Hitri navoji Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Drugo
nl: Pijp draad standaard: Angel; Autococker; Cocker snelle schroefdraad; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Overig
zh-TW: 槍管螺紋標準: Angel; Autococker; Cocker 快速螺紋; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; 其他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn ren thân phi tiêu: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast threads; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Khác
zh-CN: 枪管螺纹标准: Angel; Autococker; Cocker 快速螺纹; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; 其他
lt-LT: Standartinis cilindro sriegis: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast threads; Ion / Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5 / X-7; Kita
da: Gevindstandard for tønde: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast-gevind; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Andet
it: thread standard del barilotto: Angel; Autococker; Filettatura rapida Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Altro
cs: Standard závitu hlavně: Angel; Autococker; Rychlozávity Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Jiné
sk-SK: Štandardný závit valca: Angel; Autococker; Cocker (rýchly závit); Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Iný
de: Fass-Gewindestandard: Angel; Autococker; Cocker-Schnellgewinde; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Sonstige
sv: Standard pipmönster: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast-gängor; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Övrigt
es: Estándar de rosca del cañón: Angel; Autococker; Roscas rápidas Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Otro
hu: Hordós szál standard: Angel; Autococker; Cocker gyorsmenet; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Egyéb
bg-BG: Стандарт на резбата на цевта: Angel; Autococker; Бързи резби Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Друго
ro-RO: Standardul filetului săgeții: Angel; Autococker; Filete rapide Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Altele
hr-HR: Standardni navoj cijevi: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast threads; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Ostalo
tr: Namlu diş standardı: Angel; Autococker; Cocker hızlı dişli; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Diğer
en: Barrel thread standard: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast threads; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Other
pt-PT: Padrão de rosca do cano: Angel; Autococker; Cocker fast threads; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Outro
nb: Standard fattråd: Angel; Autococker; Cocker hurtiggjenger; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Annet
fr: Type de filetage du canon: Angel; Autococker; Cocker à filetage rapide; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Autre
pt-BR: Padrão de rosca do cano: Angel; Autococker; Roscas rápidas Cocker; Ion/Impulse; Spyder; Tippmann 98; Tippmann A-5/X-7; Outros